Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 4. Damage or Destruction of Property.

Sec. 34.07.300.
Determination to be made by apartment owners if property destroyed.

If within 60 days of damage or destruction of all or part of the property it is not determined by a majority of all apartment owners to repair, reconstruct, or rebuild in accordance with the original plan, or by a unanimous vote of all apartment owners to do otherwise, then

the property shall be owned in common by the apartment owners;

the undivided interest in the property owned in common that appertains to each apartment owner shall be the percentage of undivided interest previously owned by that owner in the common areas and facilities; and

mortgages, deeds of trust, or liens affecting any of the apartments are transferred in accordance with the existing priorities to the percentage of the undivided interest of the apartment owner in the property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.310.
Action for partition if apartment owners fail to act.

An action for partition may be started by an apartment owner if the apartment owners fail to act under AS

34.07.300

after the damage to or destruction of the property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.320.
Distribution of funds from partition sale.

The net proceeds of a sale of the property conducted in an action for partition started under AS

34.07.310

shall be considered as one fund.

The fund shall be divided into separate shares, one for each apartment owner in a percentage equal to the percentage of undivided interest that the owner has in the property.

After first paying out of the respective share of each apartment owner, all mortgages, deeds of trust, and liens on the undivided interest in the property owned by the apartment owner, the balance remaining in each share shall be distributed to each apartment owner respectively.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)